Florida, session 2026, HB877.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 465.1903, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
465.1903 Active pharmaceutical ingredients.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "bulk drug
substance" or "active pharmaceutical ingredient (API)" means any
substance that is intended for incorporation into a finished
drug product and is intended to furnish pharmacological activity
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb877-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 877 2026
or other direct effect in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease, or to affect the structure
or any function of the body. The term does not include
intermediates used in the synthesis of the substance.
(2) A person or entity may only engage in the sale,
transfer, or distribution of a drug compounded under s. 503A of
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 353a, if the
compounder of the drug uses a bulk drug substance that:
(a)1. Complies with the standards of an applicable United
States Pharmacopoeia or National Formulary monograph, if a
monograph exists, and the United States Pharmacopoeia chapter on
pharmacy compounding.
2. If such a monograph does not exist, is a bulk drug
substance that is a component of drugs approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration (FDA); or
3. If such a monograph does not exist and the bulk drug
substance is not a component of a drug approved by the FDA, that
appears on the list developed by the FDA pursuant to s. 503A of
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. s.
353a(b)(1)(A)(i)(III).
(b) Confirms that any bulk drug substance used under
subparagraph (a)2. was reviewed as part of a new drug
application approved by the FDA under s. 505 of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. s. 355.
(c) Ensures that the bulk drug substance is a
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb877-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 877 2026
pharmaceutical grade product.
(d) Verifies that the bulk drug substance is accompanied
by a valid certificate of analysis containing information
material to the safety and effectiveness of the drug compounded
using the bulk drug substance, including the identity and
content of the bulk drug substance, the country where the bulk
drug substance was originally manufactured, identification of
each impurity by chemical name and amount present, and any
additional element that the board may by regulation require.
(e) Conducts and documents quality control testing of the
bulk drug substance before its use in a compounded drug to
confirm:
1. The identity and content of the bulk drug substance.
2. That impurities present are identified, characterized,
quantified, and justified given the product and its intended
use.
(f) Obtains proof that the manufacturing of the bulk drug
substance took place in a facility that:
1. Is registered with the FDA under s. 510 of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
2. Has undergone an inspection by the FDA as a human drug
establishment within the previous 2 years, and such inspection:
a. Included current good manufacturing practice compliance
and covered the relevant API.
b. Was classified as Voluntary Action Indicated or No
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb877-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 877 2026
Action Indicated by the FDA.
(g) Complies with the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act, including the provisions in s. 503A, 21 U.S.C. s. 353a.
(3) A person or entity that violates this section shall be
subject to:
(a) A fine of $1,000 per dose of the illegally compounded
drug sold, transferred, or distributed.
(b) Revocation of the pharmacy or facility license, as
applicable.
(4) Any person or entity engaging in the sale, transfer,
or distribution of compounded drugs shall maintain all records
related to the acquisition, examination, and testing of the bulk
drug substance for at least 2 years after the expiration date of
the last lot of the drug containing the bulk drug substance and,
upon request by the board, shall furnish such records within 1
business day of receiving the request, or within a reasonable
time as determined by the board based on the circumstances of
the request.
(5) The board or its duly authorized agent, or a duly
authorized agent of a third party approved by the board, may
inspect any person or entity that engages in compounding drugs,
as well as any domestic supplier, wholesaler, repackager, or
other provider of the bulk drug substance for compounding, for
compliance with the requirements in subsection (2). Refusal to
100 permit the board or its duly authorized agent or third-party
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb877-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 877 2026
101 access to conduct an inspection shall constitute a violation of
102 this section.
103 (6) The board may adopt rules and conduct inspections as
104 necessary to implement this section.
105 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb877-00